Maryland, session 2025, SB0448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 12. SELF–DIRECTED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PILOT PROGRAM.
15–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “INDIVIDUAL–DIRECTED GOODS AND SERVICES” MEANS
SERVICES, EQUIPMENT, ACTIVITIES, OR SUPPLIES FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0448*

SENATE BILL 448
SELF–DIRECT SERVICES THAT:
(I) RELATE TO A NEED OR GOAL IDENTIFIED IN THE
PERSON–CENTERED PLAN OF SERVICE;
(II) MAINTAIN OR INCREASE INDEPENDENCE;
(III) PROMOTE OPPORTUNITIES FOR COMMUNITY LIVING AND
INCLUSION; AND
(IV) FACILITATE ACCESS TO CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE,
CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE, PERSON–CENTERED CARE.
(2) “INDIVIDUAL–DIRECTED GOODS AND SERVICES” INCLUDES ALL
GOODS OR SERVICES AUTHORIZED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED OR GUIDANCE
ISSUED BY THE FEDERAL CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES
UNDER § 1915 OF THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT.
(C) “PARTICIPANT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL SELECTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER § 15–1204(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
(D) “PERSON–CENTERED PLAN OF SERVICE” MEANS A PLAN FOR SERVICES
AND SUPPORTS THAT:
(1) IS DEVELOPED WITH A FOCUS ON THE INDIVIDUAL HAVING
CONTROL OVER THE SERVICES AND SUPPORTS;
(2) ENSURES THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS THE PRIMARY CONTRIBUTOR
TO THE PLAN AND MAY RECEIVE SUPPORT FROM OTHER PERSONS SELECTED BY THE
INDIVIDUAL IN DEVELOPING THE PLAN;
(3) IDENTIFIES AND ADDRESSES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S PREFERENCES AND INTERESTS
RELATED TO ACHIEVING THE INDIVIDUAL’S DESIRED LIFESTYLE;
(II) THE SUPPORTS REQUIRED TO ACHIEVE THE INDIVIDUAL’S
DESIRED LIFESTYLE THAT WILL BE PROVIDED IN A MANNER THAT ENABLES THE
INDIVIDUAL TO HAVE CONTROL OVER THE INDIVIDUAL’S DAILY LIFE AND
MAINTAINS THE INDIVIDUAL’S HEALTH AND WELFARE;
(III) THE SERVICES AND SUPPORTS REQUIRED TO PREVENT,

SENATE BILL 448 3
MITIGATE, AND MANAGE A MENTAL HEALTH, SUBSTANCE USE, OR SOMATIC HEALTH
CRISIS IN THE LEAST RESTRICTIVE SETTING APPROPRIATE TO AN INDIVIDUAL’S
NEEDS, INCLUDING PAYMENT FOR PEER RESPITE, IN–HOME RESPITE, OR OTHER
COMMUNITY–BASED CRISIS SERVICE; AND
(IV) THE SUPPORTS AND SERVICES AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NEED
TO SUPPORT THE INDIVIDUAL’S DECISION MAKING IN THE EVENT THE INDIVIDUAL
IS UNABLE TO MAKE OR COMMUNICATE THE INDIVIDUAL’S OWN DECISIONS DUE TO
DISABILITY, SUCH AS COMPLETION OF SUPPORTED DECISION–MAKING
AGREEMENTS, PSYCHIATRIC ADVANCED DIRECTIVES, AND IDENTIFICATION OF
NATURAL SUPPORTS; AND
(4) ALIGNS SERVICES AND SUPPORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS ACCESS TO THE FULL BENEFITS OF COMMUNITY LIVING IN A
MANNER THAT EMPHASIZES THE INDIVIDUAL’S QUALITY OF LIFE, WELL–BEING, AND
INFORMED CHOICE.
(E) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE SELF–DIRECTED MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES PILOT PROGRAM.
(F) (1) “SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES” MEANS SERVICES:
(I) OVER WHICH PARTICIPANTS OR THEIR REPRESENTATIVES
HAVE DECISION–MAKING AUTHORITY;
(II) FOR WHICH PARTICIPANTS OR THEIR REPRESENTATIVES
TAKE DIRECT RESPONSIBILITY FOR MANAGEMENT OF THE SERVICES WITH THE
ASSISTANCE OF AVAILABLE SUPPORTS CHOSEN BY THE PARTICIPANT OR THE
PARTICIPANT’S REPRESENTATIVE; AND
(III) THAT ARE PROVIDED IN A MANNER THAT:
1. FURTHERS THE RIGHT OF INDIVIDUALS TO MAKE
CHOICES ABOUT AND DIRECT ALL ASPECTS OF THEIR LIVES, INCLUDING BY
CHOOSING AND CONTROLLING THE DELIVERY OF MENTAL HEALTH AND
SUBSTANCE–RELATED SUPPORT SERVICES, WHO PROVIDES THE SERVICES, AND
HOW SERVICES ARE PROVIDED; AND
2. RECOGNIZES THAT ALL INDIVIDUALS HAVE THE
CAPACITY TO MAKE CHOICES AND MAY BE SUPPORTED IN MAKING CHOICES WHEN
GIVEN ADEQUATE SUPPORT.
(2) “SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES” INCLUDES SERVICES THAT:

SENATE BILL 448
(I) PROVIDE AN INDIVIDUAL WITH:
1. THE DECISION–MAKING AUTHORITY TO SELECT
SERVICE PROVIDERS AND VENDORS WHO PROVIDE THE INDIVIDUAL’S SERVICES;
AND
2. AUTHORITY OVER HOW FUNDS IN AN INDIVIDUAL’S
SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES BUDGET ARE SPENT WITHIN THE TOTAL APPROVED
ANNUAL BUDGET;
(II) MAXIMIZE THE OPPORTUNITIES OF AN INDIVIDUAL TO LIVE
AS INDEPENDENTLY AS POSSIBLE IN THE MOST INCLUSIVE COMMUNITY–BASED
SETTING OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S CHOICE;
(III) EMPOWER AN INDIVIDUAL TO EXERCISE CHOICE AND
CONTROL OVER NEEDED SERVICES AND SUPPORTS; AND
(IV) HELP TO MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE THE INDIVIDUAL’S
HEALTH AND QUALITY OF LIFE IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S COMMUNITY.
(G) “SUPPORT BROKER” MEANS A PERSON WHO WORKS AT THE DIRECTION
OF AND FOR THE BENEFIT OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO USES SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES,
INCLUDING BY ASSISTING THE INDIVIDUAL OR ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL CHOSEN BY
THE INDIVIDUAL WITH:
(1) MAKING INFORMED DECISIONS IN ARRANGING FOR, DIRECTING,
AND MANAGING SERVICES THE INDIVIDUAL RECEIVES, INCLUDING DECISIONS
RELATED TO PERSONNEL REQUIREMENTS AND RESOURCES NEEDED TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS;
(2) ACCESSING AND MANAGING IDENTIFIED SUPPORTS AND
SERVICES FOR THE INDIVIDUAL; AND
(3) PERFORMING OTHER TASKS AS ASSIGNED BY THE INDIVIDUAL
AND AS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
15–1202.
THERE IS A SELF–DIRECTED MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES PILOT PROGRAM
IN THE DEPARTMENT.
15–1203.

SENATE BILL 448 5
THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO FACILITATE ACCESS TO
CLINICALLY APPROPRIATE, PERSON–CENTERED, CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE, AND
TRAUMA–INFORMED SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES IN THE MOST INTEGRATED SETTING
APPROPRIATE TO AN INDIVIDUAL’S NEEDS.
15–1204.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY 100 ADULTS TO PARTICIPATE
IN THE PILOT PROGRAM:
(I) WHO ARE RECIPIENTS UNDER THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND
(II) WHOSE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH NEEDS INDICATE THAT THE
INDIVIDUALS MAY BENEFIT FROM RECEIVING SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES.
(2) WHEN SELECTING INDIVIDUALS TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PILOT
PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL GIVE PRIORITY TO INDIVIDUALS:
(I) WHO HAVE BEEN EXCLUDED FROM OR UNSUCCESSFUL IN
ASSERTIVE COMMUNITY TREATMENT OR OTHER SERVICES OFFERED IN THE PUBLIC
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM;
(II) WITH MULTIPLE DISABILITIES;
(III) WITH SEVERE MENTAL ILLNESS WITH TRAUMA–RELATED
DISORDERS;
(IV) WHOSE CULTURAL NEEDS ARE UNSERVED OR
UNDERSERVED IN THE PUBLIC BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM; OR
(V) AT RISK FOR INSTITUTIONALIZATION.
(C) THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL BE OPERATIONAL FOR A 3–YEAR PERIOD.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE TO A PARTICIPANT:
(1) INDIVIDUAL–DIRECTED GOODS AND SERVICES IN AN AMOUNT
BASED ON THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS AND THE RECIPIENT’S NEEDS AS
CALCULATED ON AN ANNUAL BASIS, AND INCLUDED IN THE RECIPIENT’S

SENATE BILL 448
PERSON–CENTERED PLAN OF SERVICES, INCLUDING REIMBURSEMENT FOR:
(I) CLINICAL MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES;
(II) MEDICATIONS AND MEDICATION CO–PAYS;
(III) AUXILIARY AIDS AND SERVICES;
(IV) TRANSPORTATION;
(V) VOCATIONAL TRAINING AND SUPPORTS;
(VI) TECHNOLOGY;
(VII) GOODS AND SERVICES NEEDED TO ASSIST WITH MEAL
PREPARATION;
(VIII) HOMEMAKER SERVICES;
(IX) TENANCY–SUSTAINING SUPPORTS, INCLUDING
SHORT–TERM RENTAL ASSISTANCE;
(X) RESPITE AND PERSONAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES; AND
(XI) CARE COORDINATION, PEER SUPPORT, AND ADVOCACY
SERVICES;
(2) A SUPPORT BROKER TO HELP THE PARTICIPANT:
(I) CREATE A PERSON–CENTERED PLAN;
(II) IDENTIFY AND OBTAIN GOODS, SERVICES, AND SUPPORTS,
INCLUDING CASE MANAGEMENT AND FISCAL INTERMEDIARY SERVICES; AND
(III) OBTAIN PAYMENT FOR GOODS, SERVICES, AND SUPPORTS;
(3) SUPPORT BROKER SERVICES THAT ARE AUTHORIZED BY THE
STATE AND SELECTED BY THE PARTICIPANT;
(4) A BUDGET FOR SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES THAT PROVIDES THE
PARTICIPANT WITH THE ABILITY TO USE FUNDS FROM THE PARTICIPANT’S
APPROVED ANNUAL BUDGET FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING ALL SERVICES NEEDED
TO CREATE, MANAGE, AND IMPLEMENT A PARTICIPANT’S PERSON–CENTERED PLAN;

SENATE BILL 448 7
AND
(5) FISCAL INTERMEDIARY AND ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT DETERMINE HOW A PARTICIPANT’S
BUDGET IS USED WITH RESPECT TO GOODS AND SERVICES THAT ARE:
(1) RELATED TO THE PERSON–CENTERED PLAN; AND
(2) NECESSARY FOR THE HEALTH AND SAFETY OF THE PARTICIPANT.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT REQUIRE A PARTICIPANT TO
DEMONSTRATE COMPETENCY OR COMPLIANCE WITH MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT
TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE OR TO CONTINUE RECEIVING SELF–DIRECTED
SERVICES.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH STAKEHOLDERS, SHALL
ESTABLISH AND PROVIDE TRAINING MATERIALS TO CORE SERVICE AGENCIES AND
COMMUNITY PROVIDERS SPECIFICALLY ADDRESSING THE SELF–DIRECTED
SERVICES MODEL OF SERVICES, INCLUDING ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA FOR
SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES, REFERRAL PROCEDURES, POLICIES, AND RESOURCES.
(H) AS PART OF THE PROCESS OF DEVELOPING A PERSON–CENTERED PLAN
OF SERVICE FOR A PARTICIPANT, A COORDINATOR OF COMMUNITY SERVICES SHALL
EDUCATE THE PARTICIPANT ON ALL MODELS OF SERVICE AVAILABLE TO THE
PARTICIPANT, INCLUDING SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES, TRADITIONAL SERVICES,
AND PROVIDER–MANAGED SERVICES, TO ASSIST THE PARTICIPANT IN MAKING AN
INFORMED CHOICE ON WHICH SERVICES THE PARTICIPANT WOULD LIKE TO
RECEIVE:
(1) WHEN THE PARTICIPANT BEGINS RECEIVING SERVICES FROM A
COORDINATOR OF COMMUNITY SERVICES; AND
(2) AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR THAT THE PARTICIPANT IS
RECEIVING SERVICES FROM A COORDINATOR OF COMMUNITY SERVICES.
(I) EACH COORDINATOR OF COMMUNITY SERVICES SHALL REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT, IN THE FORM AND MANNER REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THAT
THE COORDINATOR PROVIDED INFORMATION ON SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES,
TRADITIONAL SERVICES, AND PROVIDER–MANAGED SERVICES TO AN INDIVIDUAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(J) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:

SENATE BILL 448
(1) COLLECT OUTCOMES DATA ON PILOT PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS;
(2) COLLECT UTILIZATION DATA ON PILOT PROGRAM
PARTICIPANTS;
(3) ASSESS THE EFFICACY OF SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES RELATIVE
TO TRADITIONAL SERVICES USING APPROPRIATE STATISTICAL ANALYSES;
(4) ASSESS THE COST OF EXPANDING SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES TO
ALL INDIVIDUALS ELIGIBLE FOR SERVICES THROUGH THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM; AND
(5) IDENTIFY THE FEASIBILITY OF OBTAINING A MEDICAID WAIVER
TO SUPPORT FURTHER IMPLEMENTATION OF SELF–DIRECTED MENTAL HEALTH
SERVICES IN THE STATE.
15–1205.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTERS FOR MEDICARE AND
MEDICAID SERVICES FOR ANY DEMONSTRATION OR OTHER WAIVER OR AN
AMENDMENT TO A WAIVER OR THE STATE PLAN NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
15–1206.
FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $300,000 FOR THE
PILOT PROGRAM.
15–1207.
ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO
THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE DEPARTMENT’S FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE PILOT PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.